Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3868
(UTC 803) Impartiality.

(UTC 803) If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries' respective interests.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 68.

A trustee's duty of impartiality in administering trust property plays particular importance in distributing assets. In re Estate of Hedke, 278 Neb. 727, 775 N.W.2d 13 (2009).

In conjunction with this section and section 8-2207, a trustee has a statutory duty of impartiality. In re Trust of Rosenberg, 273 Neb. 59, 727 N.W.2d 430 (2007).